viceverser/data/fr_ud.aff
FLAG long
SFX pF Y 60
SFX pF oir oir/ voir  is:infi
SFX pF oir oyant/ voir  is:ppre
SFX pF oir u/ voir  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX pF oir us/ voir  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX pF oir ue/ voir  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX pF oir u·e/ voir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX pF oir ues/ voir  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX pF oir u·es/ voir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX pF oir ois/ voir  is:ipre is:1sg is:2sg
SFX pF oir oit/ voir  is:ipre is:3sg
SFX pF oir oyons/ voir  is:ipre is:1pl
SFX pF oir oyez/ voir  is:ipre is:2pl
SFX pF oir oient/ voir  is:ipre is:spre is:3pl
SFX pF oir oyais/ voir  is:iimp is:1sg is:2sg
SFX pF oir oyait/ voir  is:iimp is:3sg
SFX pF oir oyions/ voir  is:iimp is:spre is:1pl
SFX pF oir oyiez/ voir  is:iimp is:spre is:2pl
SFX pF oir oyaient/ voir  is:iimp is:3pl
SFX pF oir is/ voir  is:ipsi is:1sg is:2sg
SFX pF oir it/ voir  is:ipsi is:3sg
SFX pF oir îmes/ voir  is:ipsi is:1pl
SFX pF oir îtes/ voir  is:ipsi is:2pl
SFX pF oir irent/ voir  is:ipsi is:3pl!
SFX pF oir errai/ [^é]voir  is:ifut is:1sg
SFX pF oir oirai/ évoir  is:ifut is:1sg
SFX pF oir erras/ [^é]voir  is:ifut is:2sg
SFX pF oir oiras/ évoir  is:ifut is:2sg
SFX pF oir erra/ [^é]voir  is:ifut is:3sg
SFX pF oir oira/ évoir  is:ifut is:3sg
SFX pF oir errons/ [^é]voir  is:ifut is:1pl
SFX pF oir oirons/ évoir  is:ifut is:1pl
SFX pF oir errez/ [^é]voir  is:ifut is:2pl
SFX pF oir oirez/ évoir  is:ifut is:2pl
SFX pF oir erront/ [^é]voir  is:ifut is:3pl!
SFX pF oir oiront/ évoir  is:ifut is:3pl!
SFX pF oir errais/ [^é]voir  is:cond is:1sg is:2sg
SFX pF oir oirais/ évoir  is:cond is:1sg is:2sg
SFX pF oir errait/ [^é]voir  is:cond is:3sg
SFX pF oir oirait/ évoir  is:cond is:3sg
SFX pF oir errions/ [^é]voir  is:cond is:1pl
SFX pF oir oirions/ évoir  is:cond is:1pl
SFX pF oir erriez/ [^é]voir  is:cond is:2pl
SFX pF oir oiriez/ évoir  is:cond is:2pl
SFX pF oir erraient/ [^é]voir  is:cond is:3pl
SFX pF oir oiraient/ évoir  is:cond is:3pl
SFX pF oir oie/ voir  is:spre is:1sg is:3sg
SFX pF oir oies/ voir  is:spre is:2sg
SFX pF oir isse/ voir  is:simp is:1sg
SFX pF oir isses/ voir  is:simp is:2sg
SFX pF oir ît/ voir  is:simp is:3sg
SFX pF oir issions/ voir  is:simp is:1pl
SFX pF oir issiez/ voir  is:simp is:2pl
SFX pF oir issent/ voir  is:simp is:3pl
SFX pF oir ois/ voir  is:impe is:2sg
SFX pF oir oyons/ voir  is:impe is:1pl
SFX pF oir oyez/ voir  is:impe is:2pl
SFX pF oir u-e/ voir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX pF oir u-es/ voir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX pF oir u·e·s/ voir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX pF oir u-e-s/ voir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl

SFX pG Y 11
SFX pG oir errai/ voir  is:ifut is:1sg
SFX pG oir erras/ voir  is:ifut is:2sg
SFX pG oir erra/ voir  is:ifut is:3sg
SFX pG oir errons/ voir  is:ifut is:1pl
SFX pG oir errez/ voir  is:ifut is:2pl
SFX pG oir erront/ voir  is:ifut is:3pl!
SFX pG oir errais/ voir  is:cond is:1sg is:2sg
SFX pG oir errait/ voir  is:cond is:3sg
SFX pG oir errions/ voir  is:cond is:1pl
SFX pG oir erriez/ voir  is:cond is:2pl
SFX pG oir erraient/ voir  is:cond is:3pl

SFX pH Y 49
SFX pH ouvoir ouvoir/ mouvoir  is:infi
SFX pH ouvoir ouvant/ mouvoir  is:ppre
SFX pH ouvoir u/ .mouvoir  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX pH ouvoir us/ mouvoir  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX pH ouvoir ue/ mouvoir  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX pH ouvoir u·e/ mouvoir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX pH ouvoir ues/ mouvoir  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX pH ouvoir u·es/ mouvoir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX pH ouvoir eus/ mouvoir  is:ipre is:1sg is:2sg
SFX pH ouvoir eut/ mouvoir  is:ipre is:3sg
SFX pH ouvoir ouvons/ mouvoir  is:ipre is:1pl
SFX pH ouvoir ouvez/ mouvoir  is:ipre is:2pl
SFX pH ouvoir euvent/ mouvoir  is:ipre is:spre is:3pl
SFX pH ouvoir ouvais/ mouvoir  is:iimp is:1sg is:2sg
SFX pH ouvoir ouvait/ mouvoir  is:iimp is:3sg
SFX pH ouvoir ouvions/ mouvoir  is:iimp is:spre is:1pl
SFX pH ouvoir ouviez/ mouvoir  is:iimp is:spre is:2pl
SFX pH ouvoir ouvaient/ mouvoir  is:iimp is:3pl
SFX pH ouvoir us/ mouvoir  is:ipsi is:1sg is:2sg
SFX pH ouvoir ut/ mouvoir  is:ipsi is:3sg
SFX pH ouvoir ûmes/ mouvoir  is:ipsi is:1pl
SFX pH ouvoir ûtes/ mouvoir  is:ipsi is:2pl
SFX pH ouvoir urent/ mouvoir  is:ipsi is:3pl!
SFX pH ouvoir ouvrai/ mouvoir  is:ifut is:1sg
SFX pH ouvoir ouvras/ mouvoir  is:ifut is:2sg
SFX pH ouvoir ouvra/ mouvoir  is:ifut is:3sg
SFX pH ouvoir ouvrons/ mouvoir  is:ifut is:1pl
SFX pH ouvoir ouvrez/ mouvoir  is:ifut is:2pl
SFX pH ouvoir ouvront/ mouvoir  is:ifut is:3pl!
SFX pH ouvoir ouvrais/ mouvoir  is:cond is:1sg is:2sg
SFX pH ouvoir ouvrait/ mouvoir  is:cond is:3sg
SFX pH ouvoir ouvrions/ mouvoir  is:cond is:1pl
SFX pH ouvoir ouvriez/ mouvoir  is:cond is:2pl
SFX pH ouvoir ouvraient/ mouvoir  is:cond is:3pl
SFX pH ouvoir euve/ mouvoir  is:spre is:1sg is:3sg
SFX pH ouvoir euves/ mouvoir  is:spre is:2sg
SFX pH ouvoir usse/ mouvoir  is:simp is:1sg
SFX pH ouvoir usses/ mouvoir  is:simp is:2sg
SFX pH ouvoir ût/ mouvoir  is:simp is:3sg
SFX pH ouvoir ussions/ mouvoir  is:simp is:1pl
SFX pH ouvoir ussiez/ mouvoir  is:simp is:2pl
SFX pH ouvoir ussent/ mouvoir  is:simp is:3pl
SFX pH ouvoir eus/ mouvoir  is:impe is:2sg
SFX pH ouvoir ouvons/ mouvoir  is:impe is:1pl
SFX pH ouvoir ouvez/ mouvoir  is:impe is:2pl
SFX pH ouvoir u-e/ mouvoir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX pH ouvoir u-es/ mouvoir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX pH ouvoir u·e·s/ mouvoir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX pH ouvoir u-e-s/ mouvoir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl

SFX pI Y 2
SFX pI ouvoir û/ mouvoir  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX pI ouvoir u/ mouvoir  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
