viceverser/data/fr_ud.dic
émouvoir/pH  po:verb
entrevoir/pF  po:verb
mouvoir/pHpI  po:verb
prévoir/pF  po:verb
promouvoir/pH  po:verb
revoir/pF  po:verb
voir/pFpG  po:verb
